src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-lookkmosh_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - lookkmõš e-stem hand, arm/käsi: # Noun - full paradigm
     lookkmõš+N+Sg+Nom: lookkmõš
     lookkmõš+N+Sg+Gen: lookkmõõžž
     lookkmõš+N+Sg+Acc: lookkmõõžž
     lookkmõš+N+Sg+Ill: lookkmõʹšše
     lookkmõš+N+Sg+Loc: lookkmõõžžâst
     lookkmõš+N+Sg+Com: lookkmõõžžin
     lookkmõš+N+Ess: lookkmõšân
     lookkmõš+N+Par: lookkmõšâd
     lookkmõš+N+Sg+Abe: [lookkmõõžžtaa, lookkmõõžžtää]
     lookkmõš+N+Pl+Nom: lookkmõõžž
     lookkmõš+N+Pl+Gen: lookkmõõžži
     lookkmõš+N+Pl+Acc: lookkmõõžžid
     lookkmõš+N+Pl+Ill: lookkmõõžžid
     lookkmõš+N+Pl+Loc: lookkmõõžžin
     lookkmõš+N+Pl+Com: lookkmõõžživuiʹm
     lookkmõš+N+Pl+Abe: [lookkmõõžžitaa, lookkmõõžžitää]
